Hawaii statutes.
§394B-1 Findings and purpose. The
legislature finds that there is a need for employment and training assistance
for dislocated workers in Hawaii and that there is a need to protect employees
from the effects of unexpected and sudden layoffs or terminations resulting
from closings, plant closures, partial plant closures, and relocations. [L
1983, c 195, pt of §1; am L 1987, c 377, §1]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next